Indiana, session 2026, HB1212.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-15-1.3-27 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) As used in this section,
"health related social needs" means an individual's unmet, adverse
social conditions that contribute to poor health outcomes, such as
food insecurity, housing instability, unemployment, or lack of
transportation.
(b) Not later than October 1, 2026, the office of the secretary
shall apply to the United States Department of Health and Human
Services for approval of a Section 1115 Medicaid demonstration
waiver to provide Medicaid coverage for health related social
needs, including coverage for the following:
(1) Housing supports.
(2) Nutrition supports.
(3) Any other health related social needs services identified by
the office of the secretary.
2026 IN 1212—LS 6513/DI 147